Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1046.
do enact as follows:AB1046,13Section 1. 15.405 (17) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1046,2,7415.405 (17) Cosmetology examining board. There is created a cosmetology 5examining board in the department of safety and professional services. The 6cosmetology examining board shall consist of 9 members appointed for 4-year 1terms. Four members shall be licensed aestheticians or cosmetologists, 2 members 2one member shall be a public members member, one member shall be a 3representative of a private school of cosmetology, one member shall be a 4representative of a public school of cosmetology and, one member shall be a licensed 5electrologist, and one member shall be a licensed manicurist. No more than 4 6members may be connected with or have any financial interest in a cosmetology 7school.AB1046,28Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1046,2,169(1) Notwithstanding s. 15.08 (1), the governor may provisionally appoint to 10the cosmetology examining board the initial manicurist member authorized by this 11act. That provisional appointment shall be in force until withdrawn by the 12governor or acted upon by the senate and, if confirmed by the senate, shall continue 13for the remainder of the unexpired term, if any, of the member and until a successor 14is chosen and qualifies. A provisional appointee may exercise all the powers and 15duties of board membership to which the person is appointed during the time in 16which the appointee qualifies.AB1046,2,2317(2) A provisional appointment made under sub. (1) that is withdrawn by the 18governor shall, upon withdrawal, lapse and create a vacancy for provisional 19appointment of another initial manicurist member authorized by this act of the 20cosmetology examining board. Any provisional appointment made under sub. (1) 21that is rejected by the senate shall upon rejection lapse and create a vacancy for 22nomination and appointment under s. 15.08 (1) of another initial manicurist 23member authorized by this act.AB1046,3,41(3) Notwithstanding the length of terms specified for the members of the 2cosmetology examining board under s. 15.405 (17), the initial manicurist member 3authorized by this act appointed to the cosmetology examining board under this act 4shall be appointed for a term expiring on July 1, 2028.AB1046,3,55